Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-1426
Interest.

All deficiencies determined by the department and any tax paid after the time provided shall accrue interest at the rate specified in subdivision (7) of section 66-1406, as such rate may from time to time be adjusted, on such deficiency or late payment from the date such tax was due to the date of payment.

Laws 2018, LB177, § 12.